Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,500,000 for
distribution in accordance with section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall distribute  the moneys
appropriated under section 1 of this 2023 Act as follows:
(1) $2 million to the Oregon State University Extension Service for distribution  to the
Center for the Outdoor Recreation Economy  to be used for the purpose of developing pro-
fessional and workforce development programs for the outdoor recreation economy  in order
to address critical and urgent skill gaps in specialized, technical and leadership roles.
(2) $1 million  to the Oregon State University Extension Service for distribution to the
Center for the Outdoor Recreation Economy to be used for the purpose of developing  a pro-
gram to provide facilitation services and technical assistance grants to  communities affected
by wildfire for community  engagement in the planning and construction of outdoor recre-
ation facilities to support the communities’ economic  recovery. The center shall work with
the Oregon State University Extension Service in developing  the program under this sub-
section.
(3)(a) $500,000 to Oregon State University-Cascades to outfit  a fabrication and maker
space at the university in order to support prototyping of new  products by outdoor recre-
ation economy entrepreneurs in rural and central Oregon.
(b) As used in this subsection, “rural” means any area in this state that is outside:
(A) The acknowledged  urban growth boundaries of all cities with a population greater
than 50,000; and
(B) Any urbanized area contiguous to a city described in subparagraph (A) of  this para-
graph.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $500,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Business Development  Department for the purpose of
awarding matching grants under section 5 of this 2023 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3410 (HB 3410-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. As used in this section and section 5 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Business accelerator” means a company:
(a) Operating principally in this state;
(b) With demonstrated success in operating educational programs in which outdoor  gear
and apparel industry veterans mentor cohorts of founders of emerging outdoor gear and
apparel industry companies located in this state; and
(c) Whose purpose is to help incubate and accelerate  the growth of emerging companies.
(2) “Membership organization” means a nonprofit organization:
(a) Operating principally in this state;
(b) Consisting of member businesses from the outdoor gear  and apparel industry whose
principal place of business is in this state; and
(c) That has the purpose  of growing the outdoor gear and apparel industry at the state
or regional level.
(3) “Outdoor gear and apparel industry” means  all traded sector businesses that manu-
facture gear and apparel for use in outdoor recreation.
(4) “Outdoor recreation” means activities undertaken for  pleasure outdoors in natural
environments.
(5) “Traded sector” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285B.280.
SECTION 5.
(1)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall  use the expendi-
ture authority under section 3 of this 2023 Act to award matching  grants to membership
organizations and business accelerators in accordance with this section.
(b) Matching grants awarded  under this section must be used by the receiving member-
ship organizations and business accelerators for the purposes of  capacity building and tech-
nical assistance in the outdoor gear and apparel industry.
(2)(a) The department shall provide  public notice whenever there are funds available for
matching grants under this section.
(b) The notice must include  information about the requirements for eligibility and the
application process for the matching grants.
(3)(a) A membership organization or business accelerator seeking  a matching grant un-
der this section  must file with the department an application in accordance with rules
adopted by  the department pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection. The information
included with the  application must demonstrate that the applicant is a membership organ-
ization or business accelerator.
(b) The department may charge an application fee in an amount that does not exceed  the
actual costs incurred  by the department in processing applications filed pursuant to this
section.
(c) The department shall adopt  rules that establish the application process for matching
grants awarded under this section.
(4) The department may not pay the amount of a matching grant to a membership  or-
ganization or business accelerator unless the recipient has entered into  a grant agreement
with the department that establishes the deliverables required from, and other goals  to be
met by, the recipient.
SECTION 6. No later than September 15, 2024, the Oregon Business Development De-
partment shall submit, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, a report that  sets forth the
investments made pursuant to  section 5 of this 2023 Act to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to economic development.
SECTION 7. Sections 4 and 5 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to provide a grant to the Regional
Rural Revitalization Strategies Consortium, established as an  intergovernmental agreement
under ORS 190.003 to 190.130,  to provide planning, infrastructure, capital equipment and
Enrolled House Bill 3410 (HB 3410-A) Page 2
predevelopment costs for housing, to award grants and loans to capacity builders and  devel-
opers of  housing and to enter into public-private partnerships for the development of hous-
ing. Housing supported with moneys appropriated under this section may be located in any
area of this state,  except for within the urban growth boundary of a city with a population
greater than 50,000.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department  for the purpose
of awarding grants under section 10 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 10. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “County fair” and “county fairgrounds” have the  meanings given those terms in ORS
565.010.
(b) “County fair operator” means  a county fair board, fair association or fair district that
operates a county fair.
(c)(A) “Earned revenue” means revenue from the  sale of goods or services, including, but
not limited to, admission  tickets, charges for services, rentals, permits and fees, merchan-
dise, food and beverages, advertising and contracted services and performances.
(B) “Earned revenue” does not include other sources of  revenue, including, but not lim-
ited to, donations, federal, state and local governmental grants or returns on investments.
(d) “Fair association” has the meaning given that term in ORS 565.268.
(e) “Fair district” means an entity described in ORS 565.275.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop  and implement a pro-
gram for awarding grants  directly to county fair operators for the operation of county fairs
and the maintenance and repair of county fairgrounds.
(3) To be eligible for a grant, a  county fair operator must demonstrate to the
department’s satisfaction that,  at any time after February 29, 2020, and before June 30, 2023,
the operator experienced a significant loss  in earned revenue from the operation of a county
fair or county fairgrounds because of statewide mandates, or guidance of  the Oregon Health
Authority, in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
(4)(a) The department shall  prescribe the form and process, including the application
period, by which county fair operators may apply for and be awarded grants under the pro-
gram.
(b) Applications must, at a minimum,  require applicants to state their lost earned re-
venue as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(c) For purposes of reviewing applications, the department may  require applicants to
provide:
(A) The applicant’s federal tax return for the periods to which the application  relates;
and
(B) Financial documentation,  including, but not limited to, audited financial statements
or financial statements that have been approved by a certified public accountant.
(5) Before  awarding grants, the department may withhold an amount not to exceed five
percent of the total amount allocated under section 9 of this 2023 Act to reimburse  the de-
partment for the actual costs of developing and implementing the program.
(6) The department shall award grants to reimburse county  fair operators for lost earned
revenue supported by their applications as follows:
(a) If the total of all grant award  amounts exceeds $3 million, less any amount withheld
under subsection (5) of this section, the amounts shall be  reduced proportionally until they
equal $3 million, less any amount withheld under subsection (5) of this section; or
(b) If the total of all grant award amounts is less than  $3 million, less any amount
withheld under subsection (5) of this section, the amounts shall be increased  proportionally
until they equal $3 million, less any amount withheld under subsection (5) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 3410 (HB 3410-A) Page 3
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to  the Oregon Business Development Department for the purposes
of ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171.
SECTION 12. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $1,190,000, for distribution to the Oregon
Coast Visitors Association to be expended in accordance with section 13 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 13. Moneys distributed to the Oregon Coast Visitors Association by  the Oregon
Department of  Administrative Services under section 12 of this 2023 Act shall be expended
in the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) $190,000 to develop a geographic information systems  tool for food systems with blue
economy layers. The tool shall be developed  to connect food producers and food technology
businesses to suitable sites  for start-up or expansion with the goal of capturing more value
from Oregon’s natural resources and agricultural and seafood industries.
(2) $700,000 to fill gaps in regional food system aggregation and production  infrastructure
and leverage existing regional food system coordination capacity in such  a way as to imme-
diately benefit Oregon businesses. Improvements funded under this subsection shall be:
(a) The development of  coastal ports mariculture and a coculture facility in partnership
with the Oregon Kelp Alliance;
(b) The installation of  a shared-use certified commercial kitchen, processing center and
cold storage; and
(c) The development of a mobile processing unit  to be shared across multiple port dis-
tricts that will support multiple seafood producers.
(3) $300,000 to support existing businesses connected to  the projects funded under sub-
sections (1) and (2)  of this section and those businesses identified in a technical assistance
survey for rural seafood businesses that is currently  being conducted and coproduced by the
Oregon Coast Visitors Association, the Oregon State University Food  Innovation Center and
the Oregon State University Seafood  Research and Education Center, each of which will ad-
minister the technical assistance provided under this subsection.
SECTION 14. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $9,000,000,  for the purpose of funding the grant program
related to establishments that process and sell meat products, as described in section  1,
chapter 537, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 15.  Section 3, chapter 537, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Section 1 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter  537, Oregon Laws 2021,  is repealed on June 30,
[2023] 2025.
SECTION 16. Section 17 of this 2023 Act is  added to and made a part of ORS 660.300 to
660.364.
SECTION 17. (1) There is established a program in the Higher Education  Coordinating
Commission to support strategic investments in workforce  development programs and ac-
tivities in Oregon’s maritime sector, in coordination with:
(a) Local workforce development boards in regions with a  high demand for maritime
workers;
(b) Community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341; and
(c) Other workforce partners that support maritime workforce development,  including
but not limited to school districts and regional  networks that support science, technology,
engineering and mathematics.
(2) At a minimum, the program shall:
Enrolled House Bill 3410 (HB 3410-A) Page 4
(a) Make targeted investments in workforce development programs designed to advance
the growth, qualifications and availability of Oregon’s maritime workforce.
(b) Identify and develop specific sectors within the maritime workforce to  initiate new
workforce education and job skills programs  and to increase participation in existing mari-
time programs.
(c) Promote growth and development of maritime workforce development  programs in
school districts and community colleges by hiring faculty and staff with maritime  expertise
to assist with curriculum selection for educational programs and the development  of such
programs to prepare individuals for careers in the maritime sector.
(d) Foster industry involvement  in apprenticeship programs, mentorship and other pro-
grams that provide training for entry into the maritime workforce.
(e) Support  activities that prepare individuals for careers in the maritime sector, in-
cluding but not limited to educating, training and mentoring activities  related to maritime
construction and engineering and mariner training.
(f) Conduct outreach and promote awareness about opportunities to  receive maritime
training and education.
(3) The commission may adopt any rules necessary for  the implementation and adminis-
tration of this section.
SECTION 18. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $2,000,000, for carrying out the provisions
of section 17 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 19. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 8, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3410 (HB 3410-A) Page 5